Utah statutes.
63B-14-401.   Authorizations to construct capital facilities using institutional or agency funds.

(1)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  the University of Utah use donations and other institutional funds to plan, design, and construct an addition to the Social Work Building under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the university may request state funds for operations and maintenance to the extent that the university is able to demonstrate to the Board of Regents that the facility meets approved academic and training purposes under Board of Regents policy R710.

(2)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  the University of Utah use donations and other institutional funds to plan, design, and construct the first phase of a College of Humanities Building under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the university may request state funds for operations and maintenance to the extent that the university is able to demonstrate to the Board of Regents that the facility meets approved academic and training purposes under Board of Regents policy R710.

(3)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  Snow College use donations and other institutional funds to plan, design, and construct improvements to its football stadium under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated;

(b)  the contractor may be required to provide for financing of construction costs, if necessary, to cover the timing of cash flow of committed donations;

(c)  Snow College retain financial responsibility for all project costs through its commitment, if necessary, to raise student fees and seek future approval of a revenue bond;

(d)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(e)  the college may not request additional state funds for operations and maintenance.

(4)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  the Department of Corrections use donations and institutional funds provided by Snow College to plan, design, and construct an expansion of the education area at the Central Utah Correctional Facility under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the Department of Corrections may request state funds for operations and maintenance.

(5)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the Administrative Office of the Courts exercise its option to purchase the West Valley courthouse using equity accrued through its lease payments.

(6)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  the Department of Natural Resources, Division of Wildlife Resources, use up to $938,000 from the General Fund Restricted -- Fish Hatchery Maintenance Account to plan, design, and construct a Fisheries Experiment Station Technical Services Building under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated; and

(b)  the Department of Natural Resources may not request state funds for operations and maintenance.

(7)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  the Utah National Guard use federal funds to plan, design, and construct a Readiness Center for the 85th Civil Support Team under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the Utah National Guard may request state funds for operations and maintenance.

(8)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  the Utah National Guard use federal funds to plan, design, and construct a Joint Forces Headquarters addition under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the Utah National Guard may request state funds for operations and maintenance.

(9)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  the Utah National Guard use federal funds to plan, design, and construct a 19th Special Forces Armory addition under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the Utah National Guard may request state funds for operations and maintenance.

(10)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  the Utah National Guard use federal funds to plan, design, and construct a Readiness Center for the 117th Utilities Detachment and the 120th Quartermaster Detachment under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the Utah National Guard may request state funds for operations and maintenance.

(11)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the Division of Facilities Construction and Management negotiate and enter into an agreement with the city of St. George for the future exchange of the current courthouse property in St. George for a replacement court facility site, with the exchange of title occurring after funding is authorized by the Legislature for the construction of the replacement facility.

